South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4130.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 3, Chapter 7, Title 44 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 44-7-400.  Notwithstanding reporting to the Department of Public Health required pursuant to Section 44-41-60, the medical record of a patient whose pregnancy terminated due to a miscarriage may not be coded by the healthcare facility or practitioner, or otherwise designated by the facility or practitioner, as an abortion or a medical procedure or healthcare related to an abortion. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----